Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1006
Apprentice salon, defined.

Apprentice salon means a cosmetology salon licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for the teaching of any or all of the practices of cosmetology to apprentices.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-345;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 268.